District of Columbia statutes.
1-1001.05

Board of Elections — Duties.

(a)

The Board shall:

(1)

Accurately maintain a uniform, interactive computerized voter registration list which shall serve as the official voter registration list for all elections in the District, and shall contain the name, registration information, and a unique identifier assigned for every registered voter in the District. The voter registration list shall be administered pursuant to the Help America Vote Act of 2002 and pertinent federal and local law, and shall be coordinated with other District agency databases;

(2)

Take whatever action is necessary and appropriate to actively locate, identify, and register qualified voters;

(3)

Conduct elections;

(4)

Provide for recording and counting votes by means of ballots or machines or both; provided, that the Board may begin counting votes 15 days before the day of the election, but may not publish or disclose tabulation results before 8:00 p.m. on the day of the election;

(5)

Publish in the District of Columbia Register no later than 45 days before each election held under this subchapter, a fictitious name sample design and layout of the ballot to be used in the election. This requirement shall not apply to any special election to fill a vacancy in an Advisory Neighborhood Commission single-member district;

(6)

Publish in 1 or more newspapers of general circulation in the District, a sample copy of the official ballot to be used in any such election, provided, however, nothing contained herein shall require the publication of a sample copy of the official ballots to be used in the advisory neighborhood commissions’ elections;

(7)

Publish in the District of Columbia Register on the 3rd Friday of every month, the total number of qualified electors registered to vote in the District as of the last day of the month preceding publication. Such notice shall be broken down by ward and political party affiliation, where applicable, and shall list the total number of new registrants, party changes, cancellations, changes of names, and/or addresses processed under each category;

(8)

Divide the District into appropriate voting precincts, each of which shall contain at least 350 registered persons; draw precinct lines within election wards created by the Council, subject to the approval of the Council, in whole or in part, by resolution;

(9)

Operate polling places;

(10)

Provide information regarding procedures for voter registration and absentee ballots to absent uniformed services voters and overseas voters in United States elections, accept valid voter registration applications, absentee ballot applications, and absentee ballots including write-in ballots from all of those voters, and comply with the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, approved August 28, 1966 (100 Stat. 924; 42 U.S.C. § 1873ff et seq.);

(10A)

Accept absentee ballots received by the Board by 8:00 p.m. on the day of the election;

(11)

Certify nominees and the results of elections in sufficient time to comply with the requirements of the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voter Act, approved August 28, 1986 (100 Stat. 924; 42 U.S.C. § 1973ff et seq.);

(12)

Take all reasonable steps to inform all residents and voters of elections and means of casting votes therein;

(13)

Repealed;

(14)

Issue such regulations and expressly delegate authority to officials and employees of the Board (such delegations of authority only to be effective upon publication in the District of Columbia Register) as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this subchapter, Chapter 11A of this title, subchapter VII of this chapter, and related acts requiring implementation by the Board. The regulations authorized by this paragraph include those necessary to: Determine that candidates meet the statutory qualifications for office; define the form of petitions; establish rules for the circulation and filing of petitions; establish criteria to determine the validity of signatures on petitions; and provide for the registration of any political party seeking to nominate directly candidates in any general or special election;

(15)

Take reasonable steps to facilitate voting by blind persons and persons with physical and developmental disabilities, qualified to vote under this subchapter, and to authorize such persons to cast a ballot with the assistance of a person of their own choosing;

(15A)

At the request of a candidate, consider what action, if any, should be taken to clarify the identity of a candidate if there is potential for confusion among voters about the identity of a candidate because of the similarity of his or her name to another candidate or elected official;

(16)

Perform such other duties as are imposed upon it by this subchapter;

(17)

Perform duties imposed upon it by subchapter VII of this chapter; and

(18)

Tabulate all ballots in sufficient time to comply with the requirements of the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voter Act, approved August 28, 1986 (100 Stat. 924; 42 U.S.C. § 1973ff et seq.).

(a-1)

(1)

The Board shall hold regular monthly meetings in accordance with a schedule to be established by the Board. Additional meetings may be called as needed by the Board. Except in the case of an emergency, the Board shall provide at least 48 hours notice of any additional meeting.

(2)

The Board shall make available for public inspection and post on its website a proposed agenda for each Board meeting as soon as practicable, but in any event at least 24 hours before a meeting. Copies of the agenda shall be available to the public at the meeting. The Board, according to its rules, may amend the agenda at the meeting.

(3)

All meetings of the Board shall be open to the public, unless the members vote to enter into executive session. The Board shall not vote, make resolutions or rulings, or take any actions of any kind during executive session, except those that:

(A)

Relate solely to the internal personnel rules or practices of the Board;

(B)

Would result in the disclosure of matters specifically exempted from disclosure by statute; provided, that the statute:

(i)

Requires that the matters be withheld from the public in such a manner as to leave no discretion on the issue; or

(ii)

Establishes particular criteria for withholding or refers to particular types of matters to be withheld;

(C)

Would result in the disclosure of trade secrets and commercial or financial information obtained from a person and privileged or confidential;

(D)

Involve accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;

(E)

Would result in the disclosure of information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;

(F)

Would result in the disclosure of investigatory records compiled for law enforcement purposes or information which, if written, would be contained in the records, but only to the extent that the production of the records or information would:

(i)

Interfere with enforcement proceedings;

(ii)

Deprive a person of a right to a fair trial or an impartial adjudication;

(iii)

Constitute an unwarranted invasion of personal privacy; or

(iv)

Disclose investigative techniques and procedures; or

(G)

Specifically concern the Board’s issuance of a subpoena, the Board’s participation in a civil action or proceeding, or disposition by the Board of a particular matter involving a determination on the record after opportunity for a hearing.

(4)

The Board shall keep the minutes of each meeting of the Board and shall make the minutes of each meeting available to the public for inspection and distribution, and shall post the minutes on the Board’s website, as soon as practicable, but in all cases before the next regularly scheduled meeting.

(b)

(1)

The Board shall, on the 2nd Tuesday in June of each presidential election year, conduct a presidential preference primary election within the District of Columbia in which the registered qualified voters therein may express their preference for candidates of each political party of the District of Columbia for nomination for President.

(2)

No person shall be listed on the ballot as a candidate for nomination for President in such primary unless there shall have been filed with the Board no later than 90 days before the date of such presidential primary election a petition on behalf of his or her candidacy signed by at least 1,000, or 1%, whichever is less, of the qualified electors of the District of Columbia who are registered under § 1-1001.07, and of the same political party as the nominee.

(3)

(A)

Candidates for delegate and alternates where permitted by political party rules to a particular political party national convention convened to nominate that party’s candidate for President shall be listed on the ballot of the presidential preference primary held under this subchapter as:

(i)

Full slates of candidates for delegates supporting a candidate for nomination for President if there shall have been filed with the Board, no later than 90 days before the date of such presidential primary, a petition on behalf of such slate’s candidacy signed by the candidates on the slate, and by at least 1,000, or 1%, whichever is less, of the qualified electors of the District of Columbia who are registered under § 1-1001.07 and are of the same political party as the candidates on such slate;

(ii)

Full slates of candidates for delegates not committed to support any named candidate for nomination for President if there shall have been filed with the Board, no later than 90 days before the date of such presidential primary, a petition on behalf of such slate’s candidacy, signed by the candidates on the slate and by at least 1,000, or 1%, whichever is less, of the qualified electors of the District of Columbia who have registered under § 1-1001.07 and are of the same political party as the candidates on such slate;

(iii)

An individual candidate for delegate supporting a candidate for nomination for President if there shall have been filed with the Board, no later than 90 days before the date of such presidential primary, a petition on behalf of such candidate, signed by the candidate and by at least 1,000, or 1%, whichever is less, of the qualified electors of the District of Columbia who have registered under § 1-1001.07 and are of the same political party as the candidate; or

(iv)

An individual not committed to support any named candidate for nomination for President if there shall have been filed with the Board, no later than 90 days before the date of such presidential primary, a petition on behalf of such candidate, signed by the candidate and by at least 1,000, or 1%, whichever is less, of the qualified electors of the District of Columbia who have registered under § 1-1001.07 and are of the same political party as the candidate.

(B)

No candidate for delegate or alternate may be listed on the ballot unless such candidate was properly selected according to the rules of his political party relating to the nomination of candidates for delegate or alternate.

(C)

The governing body of each eligible party shall file with the Board, no later than 180 days prior to the presidential preference primary election:

(i)

Notification of that party’s intent to conduct a presidential preference primary; and

(ii)

A plan for the election detailing the procedures to be followed in the selection of individual delegates and alternates to the convention of that party, including procedures for the selection of committed and uncommitted delegates.

(4)

The Board shall:

(A)

Arrange the ballot for the presidential preference primary so as to enable each voter to indicate his or her choice for presidential nominee and for the slate of delegates and alternates pledged to support that prospective nominee with 1 mark, and provide an alternative to vote for individual delegates or uncommitted slates of delegates; and

(B)

Clearly indicate on the ballot the candidate for nomination for President which a slate or candidate for delegate supports, or name of the person who shall manage an uncommitted slate of delegates.

(5)

The delegates and alternates, of each political party in the District of Columbia to the national convention of that party convened for the nomination of that party for President, elected in accordance with this subchapter, shall only be obliged to vote for the candidate whom he or she has been selected to represent in accordance with properly promulgated rules of the political party, on the 1st ballot cast at the convention for nominees for President, or until such time as such candidate to whom the delegate is committed withdraws his candidacy, whichever 1st occurs.

(c)

Each member of the Board and persons authorized by the Board may administer oaths to persons executing affidavits pursuant to § 1-1001.08. It may provide for the administering of such other oaths as it considers appropriate to require in the performance of its functions.

(d)

The Board may permit either persons temporarily absent from the District or persons physically unable to appear personally at an official registration place to register for the purpose of voting in any election held under this subchapter.

(e)

(1)

(A)

The Board shall select, employ, and fix the compensation for an Executive Director and such staff the Board deems necessary, subject to the pay limitations of § 1-611.16. The Executive Director shall serve at the pleasure of the Board. The Board, at the request of the Director of Campaign Finance, shall provide employees, subject to the compensation provisions of this paragraph, as requested to carry out the powers and duties of the Director. Employees assigned to the Director shall, while so assigned, be under the direction and control of the Director and may not be reassigned without the concurrence of the Director.

(B)

The Executive Director shall be a District resident throughout his or her term and failure to maintain District residency shall result in a forfeiture of the position.

(C)

Notwithstanding the provisions of Unit A of Chapter 14 of Title 2, each qualified District resident applicant shall receive an additional 10-point preference over a qualified non-District resident applicant for all positions within the Board unless the applicant declines the preference. This 10-point preference shall be in addition to, and not instead of, qualifications established for the position. All persons hired after February 6, 2008, shall submit proof of residency upon employment in a manner determined by the Board. An applicant claiming the hiring preference under this section shall agree in writing to maintain bona fide District residency for a period of 7 consecutive years from the effective date of hire and shall provide proof of bona fide residency annually to the director of personnel of the Board for the first 7 years of employment. Failure to maintain District residency for the consecutive 7-year period shall result in forfeiture of employment. The Board shall submit to the Mayor and Council annual reports detailing the names of all new employees, their pay schedules, titles, and place of residence.

(2)

No provision of this subchapter shall be construed as permitting the Board to appoint any personnel who are not full-time paid employees of the Board to preliminarily determine alleged violations of the law affecting elections, conflicts of interest, or lobbying.

(3)

The Board may appoint a General Counsel to serve at the pleasure of the Board. The General Counsel shall be entitled to receive compensation at the same rate as the Executive Director of the Board and shall be responsible solely to the Board. The General Counsel shall perform such duties as may be delegated or assigned to him or her by rule or order of the Board.

(4)

(A)

The Board shall select, appoint, and fix the compensation of temporary election workers to operate the polling places, including precinct captains who shall oversee the operations of polling places in accordance with rules prescribed by the Board, and polling place workers who shall assist the precinct captains. Precinct captains shall be qualified registered electors in the District. Polling place workers shall be qualified registered electors in the District; provided, that the Board may also appoint as polling place workers individuals who are at least 16 years of age on the day that they are working in this capacity, who reside in the District of Columbia, and who are enrolled in or have graduated from a public or private secondary school or an institution of higher education. Any polling place worker shall be required to:

(i)

Complete at least 4 hours of training;

(ii)

Receive certification as a polling place worker under standards that the Board shall promulgate; and

(iii)

Take and sign an oath of office to honestly, faithfully, and promptly perform the duties of office.

(B)

The Board shall establish standards to measure the performance of polling place workers, including the past performance of a polling place worker, and shall consider the polling place worker’s past performance before appointing him or her to work as a polling place worker in a subsequent election.

(f)

(1)

The Board shall prescribe such regulations as may be necessary to ensure that all persons responsible for the proper administration of this subchapter maintain a position of strict impartiality and refrain from any activity which would imply support or opposition to:

(A)

A candidate or group of candidates for office in the District of Columbia; or

(B)

Any political party or political committee.

(2)

As used in this subsection, the terms “office,” “political party,” and “political committee” shall have the same meaning as that prescribed in § 1-1161.01.

(g)

Notwithstanding provisions of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act (§ 2-501 et seq.), the Board may hear any case brought before it under this subchapter or under Chapter 11A of this title by 1 member panels. An appeal from a decision of any such 1 member panel may be taken to either the full Board or to the District of Columbia Court of Appeals, at the option of any adversely affected party. If appeal is taken directly to the District of Columbia Court of Appeals, the decision of a 1 member panel shall be, for purposes of such appeal, considered to be a final decision of the Board. If an appeal is taken from a decision of a 1 member panel to the full Board, the decision of the 1 member panel shall be stayed pending a final decision of the Board. The Board may, upon a vote of the majority of its members, hear de novo all issues of fact or law relating to an appeal of a decision of a 1 member panel, except the Board may decide to consider only the record made before such 1 member panel. A final decision of the full Board, relating to an appeal brought to it from a 1 member panel, shall be appealable to the District of Columbia Court of Appeals in the same manner and to the same extent as all other final decisions of the Board.

(h)

(1)

The Board, pursuant to regulations of general applicability, shall have the power to:

(A)

Require by subpoena the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of documents relating to the execution of the Board’s duties; and

(B)

Order that testimony in any proceeding or investigation be taken by deposition before any person who is designated by the Board, and has the power to administer oaths and, in these instances, to compel the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of documents by subpoena.

(2)

The Board may petition the Superior Court of the District of Columbia to enforce the subpoena or order, in the case of a refusal to obey a subpoena or order of the Board issued pursuant to this subsection. Any person failing to obey the Court’s order may be held in contempt of court.

(i)

The Board shall cause the following information to be posted at each polling place on the day of each election for federal office:

(1)

A sample version of the ballot that will be used for the election;

(2)

The election and the hours during which polling places will be open;

(3)

Instructions on the proper manner of completing a ballot, including a special ballot;

(4)

Instructions for mail-in registrants and first-time voters under section 303(b) of the Help America Vote Act of 2002 [42 U.S.C. § 15483(b)];

(5)

General information on voting rights under applicable federal and District laws, including the right to cast a special ballot and instructions to contact the appropriate officials if these rights are alleged to have been violated;

(6)

General information on federal and District law regarding prohibitions on acts of voter fraud and misrepresentation; and

(7)

The documentation required for a qualified elector to verify residency and register to vote at the polling place.

(j)

Not later than 90 days after the date of each regularly scheduled general election for federal office, the Board shall submit to the Mayor a report, in the format established by the United States Election Assistance Commission, on the number of absentee ballots sent to absent uniformed services voters and overseas voters for the election and the number of ballots which were returned by those voters to the Board. The report shall be transmitted by the Mayor to the United States Election Assistance Commission, and shall be made available to the general public.

(k)

Within 90 days following a general election, the Board shall publish on its website an after-action report. The report shall include the following information:

(1)

The total number of votes cast, broken down by type of ballot, and including the number of spoiled ballots and special ballots that were not counted;

(2)

The number of persons registered:

(A)

More than 30 days preceding the election;

(B)

Between 30 days preceding the election and the date of the election; and

(C)

On the date of the election;

(3)

The number of polling place workers, by precinct;

(4)

Copies of any unofficial summary reports generated by the Board on election night;

(5)

A synopsis of any issues identified in precinct captain or area representative logs;

(6)

Performance measurement data of polling place workers;

(7)

A description of any irregularities experienced on election day;

(7A)

Recommendations for means by which the efficiency, accuracy, and speed of counting and reporting election results can be improved, including equipment or technology and an estimate of associated costs; and

(8)

Any other information considered relevant by the Board.

History

Aug. 12, 1955, 69 Stat. 700, ch. 862, § 5
Oct. 4, 1961, 75 Stat. 817, Pub. L. 87-389, § 1(3), (4), (5), (6)
Apr. 22, 1968, 82 Stat. 103, Pub. L. 90-292, § 4(3)
Dec. 23, 1971, 85 Stat. 789, Pub. L. 92-220, § 1(5)-(7), (28), (29)
Aug. 14, 1973, 87 Stat. 311, Pub. L. 93-92, § 1(2)-(7)
Jan. 3, 1975, 88 Stat. 2177, Pub. L. 93-635, § 13
Dec. 16, 1975, D.C. Law 1-37, § 2(1), (2), 22 DCR 3426
Dec. 16, 1975, D.C. Law 1-38, § 4, 22 DCR 3433
Feb. 17, 1976, D.C. Law 1-45, § 2, 22 DCR 4678
Sept. 2, 1976, D.C. Law 1-79, title I, § 102(5), (6), title V, §§ 502, 503, 23 DCR 2050
Apr. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 1-126, title I, § 103(b), title III, § 301(c)-(f), title IV, § 402, 24 DCR 2372
June 28, 1977, D.C. Law 2-12, § 6(j), 24 DCR 1442
Aug. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-101, § 2, 25 DCR 257
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3205(v), 25 DCR 5740
Oct. 8, 1981, D.C. Law 4-35, § 3, 28 DCR 3376
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-88, § 2(d), (p), (q), 29 DCR 458
July 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-120, § 2(a), 29 DCR 2064
Aug. 2, 1983, D.C. Law 5-17, § 5(b), 30 DCR 3196
Oct. 9, 1987, D.C. Law 7-36, § 3, 34 DCR 5321
Mar. 16, 1988, D.C. Law 7-92, § 3(a)-(c), 35 DCR 716
Mar. 11, 1992, D.C. Law 9-75, § 2(a), 39 DCR 310
Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-40, § 2, 46 DCR 6550
June 21, 2003, D.C. Law 15-18, § 2(a), 50 DCR 3389
Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-188, § 2, 51 DCR 6732
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-218, § 2(b), 51 DCR 9132
Apr. 7, 2006, D.C. Law 16-91, § 127(a), 52 DCR 10637
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 6(a), 53 DCR 6198
Oct. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-26, § 2(b), 54 DCR 8018
Feb. 6, 2008, D.C. Law 17-108, § 205, 54 DCR 10993
Feb. 4, 2010, D.C. Law 18-103, § 2(c), 56 DCR 9169
Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-330, § 2(a), 58 DCR 20
June 16, 2011, D.C. Law 19-7, § 2(a), 58 DCR 3882
Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(g)(4), 59 DCR 1862
June 5, 2012, D.C. Law 19-137, §§ 121(a), 201(a), 59 DCR 2542
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-273, § 2(a), 62 DCR 1938

Cross References

Advisory Neighborhood Commissions, elections, see § 1-309.05 et seq.
District of Columbia administration, volunteers, see § 1-319.01.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-1001.07, § 1-1001.10, § 1-1001.15, and § 1-1001.17.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1306.
1973 Ed., § 1-1105.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-40 added subsec. (h).
D.C. Law 15-18, in subsec. (b)(1), substituted “2nd Tuesday in January” for “1st Tuesday in May”.
D.C. Law 15-188 added par. (4) of subsec. (e).
D.C. Law 15-218 rewrote pars. (1) and (10) of subsec. (a); repealed par. (13) of subsec. (a); and added subsecs. (i) and (j).
D.C. Law 16-91, in subsec. (a)(10), substituted “United States Election” for “Federal Election”; and, in subsecs. (a) and (j), validated other previously made technical corrections.
D.C. Law 16-305, in subsec. (a)(15), substituted “blind persons and person with physical and developmental disabilities” for “blind, physically handicapped, and developmentally disabled persons”.
D.C. Law 17-26, in subsec. (b)(1), substituted “2nd Tuesday in February” for “2nd Tuesday in January”.
D.C. Law 17-108, in subsec. (e)(1), designated the existing text as subpar. (A) and added subpars. (B) and (C).
D.C. Law 18-103 added subsecs. (a-1) and (k); and rewrote subsec. (e)(4).
D.C. Law 18-330, in subsec. (a)(15), deleted “and” from the end; and added subsec. (a)(15A).
D.C. Law 19-7, in subsec. (b)(1), substituted “shall, on the 1st Tuesday in April of each presidential election year,” for “shall, on the 2nd Tuesday in February of each presidential election year,”.
D.C. Law 19-124, in the subsection heading, substituted “Board of Elections” for “Board of Elections and Ethics”; in subsecs. (a)(14) and (g), substituted “Chapter 11A of this title” for “subchapter I of Chapter 11 of this title”; and, in subsec. (f)(2), substituted “§ 1-1161.01” for “§ 1-1101.01”.
D.C. Law 19-137, in subsec. (a), substituted “subchapter VII of this chapter, and related acts” for “and related acts” in par. (14), deleted “and” from the end of par. (15), substituted “; and” for a period the end of par. (16), and added par. (17); and, in subsecs. (b)(2), (3)(A)(i) to (iv), substituted “90 days” for “60 days”.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-273 rewrote (a)(4) and (a)(11); added (a)(10) and (a)(18); substituted “shall, on the 2nd Tuesday in June” for “shall, on the 1st Tuesday in April” in (b)(1); and added (i)(7) and (k)(7A).

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Board of Elections and Ethics Subpoena Authority Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-179, March 26, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 3405).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Youth Pollworker Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-169, June 28, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 7278).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Presidential Primary Petition Waiver and Democratic State Committee Elections Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-55, December 9, 2003, law notification 51 DCR 1790).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Presidential Primary Petition and Filing Waiver Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-80, March 10, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 3372).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Help America Vote Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-120, March 30, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 3807).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Help America Vote Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 17-127, March 30, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 3807).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Presidential Primary Ballot Access Temporary Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Law 17-127, March 20, 2008, law notification 55 DCR 4279).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 121 of the Uniform Military and Overseas Voters Temporary Act of 2011 (D.C. Law 19-88, December 6, 2011).
For temporary (225 day) addition of sections, see §§ 101 - 120 of the Uniform Military and Overseas Voters Temporary Act of 2011 (D.C. Law 19-88, December 6, 2011).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the (D.C. Law 19-95, ).
For temporary (225 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-273, § 5, see § 21 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 21-76, Feb. 27, 2016, 63 DCR 264).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2 of the District of Columbia Board of Elections and Ethics Subpoena Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-409, July 22, 1998, 45 DCR 5178), see § 2 of the Board of Elections and Ethics Subpoena Authority Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-462, October 28, 1998, 45 DCR 7816), and see § 2 of the Board of Elections and Ethics Subpoena Authority Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-2, February 8, 1999, 46 DCR 2286).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Youth Pollworker Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-305, March 25, 2002, 49 DCR 3404).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Youth Pollworker Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-419, July 17, 2002, 49 DCR 7410).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Presidential Primary Election Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-43, March 24, 2003, 50 DCR 2805).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Presidential Primary Petition Waiver and Democratic State Committee Elections Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-135, July 29, 2003, 50 DCR 6857).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Presidential Primary Petition and Filing Waiver Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-207, October 24, 2003, 50 DCR 9853).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Help American Vote Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-283, December 18, 2003, 51 DCR 197).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Help America Vote Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-405, March 18, 2004, 51 DCR 3650).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Youth Poll Worker Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-494, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8791).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Help America Vote Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-658, December 29, 2004, 52 DCR 492).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Presidential Primary Ballot Access Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-231, December 27, 2007, 55 DCR 231).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of Omnibus Election Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-236, November 30, 2009, 56 DCR 9154).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2 of Precinct Boundary Changes Emergency Approval Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-219, November 7, 2011, 58 DCR 9472).
For temporary (90 day) addition of sections, see §§ 101 to 120 of Comprehensive Military and Overseas Voters Accommodation Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-230, November 16, 2011, 58 DCR 9942).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 121(a), 201(a)(1) of Comprehensive Military and Overseas Voters Accommodation Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-230, November 16, 2011, 58 DCR 9942).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Presidential Primary Ballot Access Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-260, December 21, 2011, 58 DCR 11230).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 401(g)(4) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).
For temporary (90 day) addition of sections, see §§ 101 to 120 of Comprehensive Military and Overseas Voters Accommodation Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-310, February 22, 2012, 59 DCR 1688).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 121(a), 201(a)(1) of Comprehensive Military and Overseas Voters Accommodation Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-310, February 22, 2012, 59 DCR 1688).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Presidential Primary Ballot Access Emergency Amendment Act of 2016 (D.C. Act 21-290, Jan. 27, 2016, 63 DCR 1205).

References in Text

Section 303(b) of the Help America Vote Act of 2002, referred to in par. (4) of subsec. (i) is codified as 42 U.S.C. A. § 15483(b).

Resolutions

Resolution 14-541, the “Precinct Boundary Changes Emergency Approval Resolution of 2002”, was approved effective July 26, 2002.

Resolution 14-587, the “Ward 6 Precinct Establishment Emergency Approval Resolution of 2002”, was approved effective October 18, 2002.

Editor's Notes

Adjustments to voting precinct boundaries approved: Pursuant to Resolution 9-120 by the Council of the District of Columbia, The “Precinct Boundary Changes Approval Resolution of 1991,” the Council of the District of Columbia disapproved in part, and approved in part, the adjustments to voting precinct boundaries as adopted by the Board of Elections and Ethics on September 6, 1991, to be effective January 1, 1992: the Council disapproved the proposed change in the boundary between precinct 127 (Ward 2) and precinct 131 (Ward 6); the Council approved all of the remaining proposed changes affecting precincts 1, 5, 6, 7, 8, 11, 12, 13, 14, 83, 114, 119, 128, 130, 131, 132, 133, and 134, and a map was included of such changes.

Precinct boundaries approved: Pursuant to § 1-1001.05(a)(8), § 2 of D.C. Law 7-36 approved boundary divisions for Precincts 50, 71, and 112 and the boundary line between Precincts 11 and 12.

Voting accessibility for the elderly and handicapped: Public Law 98-435 enacted the Voting Accessibility for the Elderly and Handicapped Act.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-273: Section 5 of D.C. Law 20-273 provided (a) that the act shall apply upon the date of inclusions of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan; (b) that the Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council of the certification; and (c) that the Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in the District of Columbia Register and that the date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the applicability of the act.

The Budget Director of the Council of the District of Columbia has determined that the fiscal effect of D.C. Law 20-273 has been included in an approved budget and financial plan.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-211), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-213(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.